utilities/dictionaries/ia_IA-Interlingua.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX l Y 10
SFX l   ple     llion/_SN       iple    ds:illion
SFX l   uple    illion/_SN      uple    ds:illion
SFX l   a       illion/_zSN     a       ds:illion
SFX l   0       llion/_zSN      i       ds:illion
SFX l   ple     lliardo/_SN     iple    ds:illiardo
SFX l   uple    illiardo/_SN    uple    ds:illiardo
SFX l   a       illiardo/_zSN   a       ds:illiardo
SFX l   0       lliardo/_zSN    i       ds:illiardo
SFX l   0       llion/_JSN      enti    ds:illion
SFX l   0       lliardo/_JSN    enti    ds:illiardo

SFX m Y 3
SFX m   r   mento/_S    ar  ds:a    ds:mento
SFX m   er  imento/_S   er  ds:i    ds:mento
SFX m   r   mento/_S    ir  ds:i    ds:mento

SFX n Y 5
SFX n   r   tion/_S     ar      ds:a    ds:tion
SFX n   er  ition/_S    er      ds:i    ds:tion
SFX n   r   tion/_S     ir      ds:i    ds:tion
SFX n   -   ion/_S      t-      ds:0    ds:tion
SFX n   -   ion/_S      [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sion

SFX o Y 8
SFX o   a   smo/_S  ia      ds:ismo
SFX o   e   smo/_S  ie      ds:ismo
SFX o   o   smo/_S  io      ds:ismo
SFX o   0   smo/_S  i       ds:ismo
SFX o   a   ismo/_S [^i]a   ds:ismo
SFX o   e   ismo/_S [^i]e   ds:ismo
SFX o   o   ismo/_S [^i]o   ds:ismo
SFX o   0   ismo/_S [^aeio] ds:ismo


SFX p Y 4
SFX p   a   uple/_O a   ds:upl
SFX p   o   uple/_O o   ds:upl
SFX p   e   uple/_O e   ds:upl
SFX p   i   uple/_O i   ds:upl

SFX q Y 20
SFX q   a   c/_B   ia       ds:ic
SFX q   e   c/_B   ie       ds:ic
SFX q   o   c/_B   io       ds:ic
SFX q   0   c/_B   i        ds:ic
SFX q   a   ic/_B  [^i]a    ds:ic
SFX q   e   ic/_B  [^isx]e  ds:ic
SFX q   o   ic/_B  [^i]o    ds:ic
SFX q   0   ic/_B  [^aeio]  ds:ic
SFX q   se  tic/_B  se      ds:ic
SFX q   xe  ctic/_B xe      ds:ic
SFX q   a   chissime/_B     ia       ds:ic
SFX q   e   chissime/_B     ie       ds:ic
SFX q   o   chissime/_B     io       ds:ic
SFX q   0   chissime/_B     i        ds:ic
SFX q   a   ichissime/_B    [^i]a    ds:ic
SFX q   e   ichissime/_B    [^isx]e  ds:ic
SFX q   o   ichissime/_B    [^i]o    ds:ic
SFX q   0   ichissime/_B    [^aeio]  ds:ic
SFX q   se  tichissime/_B   se      ds:ic
SFX q   xe  ctichissime/_B  xe      ds:ic

SFX r Y 10
SFX r   a   citate/_S   ia       ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   e   citate/_S   ie       ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   o   citate/_S   io       ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   0   citate/_S   i        ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   a   icitate/_S  [^i]a    ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   e   icitate/_S  [^isx]e  ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   o   icitate/_S  [^i]o    ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   0   icitate/_S  [^aeio]  ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   se  ticitate/_S  se      ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   xe  cticitate/_S xe      ds:ic   ds:itate

SFX s Y 16
SFX s   a   stic/_B     ia      ds:istic
SFX s   e   stic/_B     ie      ds:istic
SFX s   o   stic/_B     io      ds:istic
SFX s   0   stic/_B     i       ds:istic
SFX s   a   istic/_B    [^i]a   ds:istic
SFX s   e   istic/_B    [^i]e   ds:istic
SFX s   o   istic/_B    [^i]o   ds:istic
SFX s   0   istic/_B    [^aeio] ds:istic
SFX s   a   stichissime/_B     ia      ds:istic
SFX s   e   stichissime/_B     ie      ds:istic
SFX s   o   stichissime/_B     io      ds:istic
SFX s   0   stichissime/_B     i       ds:istic
SFX s   a   istichissime/_B    [^i]a   ds:istic
SFX s   e   istichissime/_B    [^i]e   ds:istic
SFX s   o   istichissime/_B    [^i]o   ds:istic
SFX s   0   istichissime/_B    [^aeio] ds:istic

SFX t Y 9
SFX t   r   tor/_F      ar      ds:a    ds:tor
SFX t   er  itor/_F     er      ds:i    ds:tor
SFX t   r   tor/_F      ir      ds:i    ds:tor
SFX t   -   or/_F       t-      ds:0    ds:tor
SFX t   -   or/_F       [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sor
SFX t   r   trice/_S    ar      ds:a    ds:trice
SFX t   er  itrice/_S   er      ds:i    ds:trice
SFX t   r   trice/_S    ir      ds:i    ds:trice
SFX t   -   rice/_S     t-      ds:0    ds:trice
#SFX t  -   rice/_S     [sx]-   ds:0    ds:srice

SFX u Y 5
SFX u   r   tura/_S     ar      ds:a    ds:tura
SFX u   er  itura/_S    er      ds:i    ds:tura
SFX u   r   tura/_S     ir      ds:i    ds:tura
SFX u   -   ura/_S      t-      ds:0    ds:tura
SFX u   -   ura/_S      [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sura

SFX v Y 10
SFX v   r   tive/_B         ar      ds:a    ds:tiv
SFX v   er  itive/_B        er      ds:i    ds:tiv
SFX v   r   tive/_B         ir      ds:i    ds:tiv
SFX v   -   ive/_B          t-      ds:0    ds:tiv
SFX v   -   ive/_B          [sx]-   ds:0    ds:siv
SFX v   r   tivissime/_B    ar      ds:a    ds:tiv  ds:issim
SFX v   er  itivissime/_B   er      ds:i    ds:tiv  ds:issim
SFX v   r   tivissime/_B    ir      ds:i    ds:tiv  ds:issim
SFX v   -   ivissime/_B     t-      ds:0    ds:tiv  ds:issim
SFX v   -   ivissime/_B     [sx]-   ds:0    ds:siv  ds:issim

SFX w Y 5
SFX w   r   tivitate/_S     ar      ds:a    ds:tiv  ds:itate
SFX w   er  itivitate/_S    er      ds:i    ds:tiv  ds:itate
SFX w   r   tivitate/_S     ir      ds:i    ds:tiv  ds:itate
SFX w   -   ivitate/_S      t-      ds:0    ds:tiv  ds:itate
SFX w   -   ivitate/_S      [sx]-   ds:0    ds:siv  ds:itate

SFX x Y 19
SFX x   0   -un/_N      .
SFX x   0   -duo/_N     .
SFX x   0   -tres/_N    .
SFX x   0   -tre/_N     .
SFX x   0   -quatro/_N  .
SFX x   0   -cinque/_N  .
SFX x   0   -sex/_N     .
SFX x   0   -septe/_N   .
SFX x   0   -octo/_N    .
SFX x   0   -nove/_N    .
SFX x   0   -prime/_O   .
SFX x   0   -secunde/_O .
SFX x   0   -tertie/_O  .
SFX x   0   -quarte/_O  .
SFX x   0   -quinte/_O  .
SFX x   0   -sexte/_O   .
SFX x   0   -septime/_O .
SFX x   0   -octave/_O  .
SFX x   0   -none/_O    .

SFX y Y 19
SFX y   i   esimoprime/_O   i
SFX y   i   esimosecunde/_O i
SFX y   i   esimotertie/_O  i
SFX y   i   esimoquarte/_O  i
SFX y   i   esimoquinte/_O  i
SFX y   i   esimosexte/_O   i
SFX y   i   esimoseptime/_O i
SFX y   i   esimoctave/_O   i
SFX y   i   esimonone/_O    i
SFX y   e   oprime/_O   cime
SFX y   e   osecunde/_O cime
SFX y   e   otertie/_O  cime
SFX y   e   oquarte/_O  cime
SFX y   e   oquinte/_O  cime
SFX y   e   osexte/_O   cime
SFX y   e   oseptime/_O cime
SFX y   e   octave/_O   cime
SFX y   e   onone/_O    cime
SFX y   e   odecime/_O  [^c]..e
